Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 6. Wyoming Council for Women's Issues

§§ 9-2-601 and 9-2-602.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as

9-12-501

and

9-12-502

by Laws 2002, ch. 2, § 1.

§ 9-2-603.
Wyoming council for women’s issues; creation; areas of attention.

The Wyoming council for women’s issues is created within the department of workforce services. The council for women’s issues shall focus attention on the status of women in Wyoming with emphasis on the following areas:

Employment practices;

Educational opportunities;

Home and community;

Legal rights and responsibilities.

As used in this article, unless otherwise specified, “council” means the Wyoming council for women’s issues.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 150, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-229.1; Laws 1977, ch. 36, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-3-1201; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; Rev. W.S. 1977, §

9-2-601

; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-12-501

by 2022 ch. 10, § 1, effective March 8, 2022.

The 2022 amendment

substituted “department of workforce services” for “Wyoming business council” in the first sentence of the introductory language of (a).

Laws 2022, ch. 10, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 8, 2022.

§ 9-2-604.
Membership; term; appointments; vacancies; removal; officers; acceptance of gifts and donations; expenses.

The council shall be composed of fourteen (14) members, each of whom shall serve for a term of six (6) years. The governor shall make the appointments and fill any vacancies for unexpired terms. The governor may remove any member as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The council shall be composed of one (1) woman from each of the judicial districts in the state, four (4) persons chosen at large and the director of the department of workforce services or the director’s designee who shall be an ex officio member. Not more than seventy-five percent (75%) of the members shall be from the same political party. Of the initial members appointed from each of the judicial districts, three (3) members shall be appointed for terms of two (2) years, three (3) members shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years and three (3) members shall be appointed for terms of six (6) years.

The council shall elect a chairman and vice-chairman from its members. The department of workforce services may employ a secretary on a part-time basis to assist the council. The council may accept gifts and donations.

Members of the council shall receive no compensation but shall be reimbursed under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for per diem and travel expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 150, §§ 2, 4; W.S. 1957, §§ 9-229.2, 9-229.4; Laws 1971, ch. 9, § 1; 1977, ch. 36, § 1; W.S. 1977, §§ 9-3-1202, 9-3-1204; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1987, ch. 175, § 1; 1989, ch. 139, § 2; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 2000, ch. 40, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1977, § 9-2-602; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; renumbered from Wyo. Stat. §

9-12-502

by 2022 ch. 10, § 1, effective March 8, 2022.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “seventy-five percent (75%) of the” for “four (4)” in (a).

The 2022 amendment,

substituted “director of the department of workforce services or the director's” for “chief executive officer of the Wyoming business council or his” in the third sentence of (a); and “department of workforce services” for “Wyoming business council” in the second sentence of (b).

Laws 2022, ch. 10, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 8, 2022.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2016, ch. 119 § 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”